Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.270

Collection, disposition, of revenue—Depository.

All taxes levied under this chapter shall be computed and entered on the county assessment roll and collected at the same time and in the same manner as other county taxes. When collected, the taxes shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district.

If the district is in more than one county the treasury of the county in which the district is organized is the depository of all funds of the district.

The treasurers of the other counties shall, at any time, not oftener than twice each year, upon the order of the district board settle with the district board and pay over to the treasurer of the county where the district is organized all money in their possession belonging to the district. The last named treasurer shall give a receipt for the money and place it to the credit of the district.

[ 1957 c 153 s 27.]